Colorado statutes. TITLE 3 United States
ARTICLE 1 PROPERTY CEDED TO UNITED STATES
3-1-130. Rocky Mountain National Park.

Exclusive jurisdiction shall be and the same is hereby ceded to the United States of America over and within all of the territory which is now included in that tract of land in the state of Colorado set aside and dedicated for park purposes by the United States, known as the Rocky Mountain National Park, saving, to the state of Colorado to the right to serve civil or criminal process within the limits of the aforesaid park, in suits or prosecutions for or on account of rights acquired, obligations incurred, or crimes committed outside of said park, and saving further to the said state the right to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and property on the lands included in said tracts, and saving, also, to the persons residing in said park now or hereafter the right to vote at all elections held within the county or counties in which said tracts are situated; and saving to all persons residing within said park upon lands now privately owned within said park access to and from such lands, and all rights and privileges as citizens of the United States and saving to the people of Colorado all vested, appropriated, and existing water rights and rights-of-way connected therewith, including all existing irrigation conduits and ditches; but jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States now or hereafter over any lands included within said park until the United States, through its proper officers, notifies the state of Colorado, through its governor, that the United States assumes police jurisdiction over the respective tracts involved.

Exclusive jurisdiction is hereby ceded to the United States over and within all the territory added since February 19, 1929, to that tract of land in the state of Colorado set aside and dedicated for park purposes by the United States, known as the Rocky Mountain National Park; saving, to the state of Colorado all criminal and civil jurisdiction over the existing sixty feet in width right-of-way of the westbound traffic lanes of state highway No. 262, also known as the Moraine Park road, and a strip of land thirty feet to either side of the center line of the eastbound traffic lanes lying south of the westbound traffic lanes of said state highway No. 262, together with the connecting roads between the eastbound and westbound traffic lanes of said highway, as rerouted and constructed by the United States where such lie within the boundaries of aforesaid National Park in the northwest quarter of section 35, township 5 north, range 73 west of the 6th p.m.; also, saving to the state of Colorado the right to serve civil or criminal process within the limits of the aforesaid park, in suits or prosecutions for or on account of rights acquired, obligations incurred, or crimes committed outside of said park, and saving to the state the right to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and property on lands included in the added tracts, and saving to persons residing in said park the right to vote at all elections held within the county or counties in which the tracts are situated, and saving to all persons residing within the park upon lands now privately owned within the addition to the park, access to and from such lands, and all rights and privileges as citizens of the United States, and saving to the people of Colorado all vested, adjudicated, appropriated, and existing water rights and rights-of-way connected therewith, including all existing domestic or irrigation conduits and ditches; but jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States now or hereafter over any lands included within said park until the United States, through its proper officers, notifies the state, through its governor, that the United States assumes police jurisdiction over the respective tracts involved.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 475, § 1.

CSA:

C. 168, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-33.

L. 61:

p. 837, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-33.

3-1-131. Mesa Verde National Park.

Exclusive jurisdiction shall be and the same is hereby ceded to the United States over and within all the territory which is now or may hereafter be included in that tract of land in the state of Colorado set aside and dedicated for park purposes by the United States, known as Mesa Verde National Park, saving, however, to the state of Colorado the right to serve civil or criminal process within the limits of the aforesaid park, in suits or prosecutions for or on account of rights acquired, obligations incurred, or crimes committed outside of said park, and saving further to the said state the right to tax persons and corporations, their franchises and property on the lands included in said tracts, and saving also to the persons residing in said park now or hereafter the right to vote at all elections held within the county or counties in which said tracts are situated; but jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States now or hereafter over any lands included within said park until the United States, through its proper officer, notifies the state of Colorado, through its governor, that the United States assumes police jurisdiction over the respective tracts involved.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 481, § 1.

CSA:

C. 168, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-34.

3-1-132. Air corps technical school - Denver.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

The state of Colorado hereby accepts the relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction from the United States of America over the real property comprising Lowry Air Force base, formerly a branch of the air corps technical school located in Denver.

The transfer of legislative jurisdiction shall be effective upon acceptance by the governor of the notice of relinquishment filed by the secretary of the Air Force pursuant to 10 U.S.C. sec. 2683. The governor shall notify the office of legislative legal services of the date of such acceptance.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 39:

pp. 467, 468, §§ 1-3.

CSA:

omitted.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-35.

L. 55:

p. 931, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-35.

L. 94:

(4) added, p. 648, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2013:

(4) (c) repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1662, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(c) provided for the repeal of subsections (1) to (3), effective on the date of the transfer of legislative jurisdiction, May 1, 1994.

3-1-133. Acceptance of jurisdiction over Fort Lyon - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 67:

p. 7, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-36.

L. 2011:

(2) added by revision, (SB 11-214), ch. 147, pp. 511, 513, §§ 1, 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 1, 2012. (See L. 2011, p. 513.)

3-1-134. Consent to acquisition of land for certain purposes.

Consent of the state of Colorado is hereby given for the acquisition by the United States of such lands in the state of Colorado as in the opinion of the secretary of agriculture of the United States may be needed for stream flow protection, production of timber, erosion control, and related purposes, by exchange of lands in the state of Colorado administered under the "Weeks Law", subject to the right of the state to cause its civil and criminal processes to be executed on such lands and to punish offenses against the laws of this state committed on lands so acquired, except that before any lands owned by the state of Colorado may be exchanged under the provisions of this article, said exchange or exchanges must be approved by the state board of land commissioners or the executive director of the department of natural resources.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 425, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-37.

Cross references:

For the text to "Weeks Law" referred to in this section, see 16 U.S.C. secs. 480, 500, 515 to 519, 521, 552, and 563.

3-1-135. United States Army Garrison, Fitzsimons - Aurora - acceptance of jurisdiction.

The state of Colorado hereby accepts the relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction from the United States of America over the real property comprising the United States Army Garrison, Fitzsimons, located in the city of Aurora. The transfer of legislative jurisdiction shall be effective upon acceptance by the governor of the notice of relinquishment filed by the secretary of the Army pursuant to 10 U.S.C. sec. 2683. The governor shall notify the office of legislative legal services of the date of such acceptance. The state shall not incur or assume any liability as a result of accepting the relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 9, § 1, effective March 13.

3-1-136. Jurisdiction for land located in Buckley Air Force base.

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the state of Colorado cedes jurisdiction to the United States over property known as Tract 100 within the confines of federally-owned property known as Buckley Air Force base situated in section nine, township four south, range sixty-six west of the sixth principal meridian, Arapahoe county, Colorado.

Cessation of the state's jurisdiction over such property shall be under the same terms and conditions as for other property within the Buckley Air National Guard base previously conveyed by the state, including the retention of the right to serve all civil and criminal process within the boundaries of such property. The retention of such right shall continue so long as the United States shall own such property.

The state of Colorado hereby cedes concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of the state to the United States over the following tract of land situated in the Buckley Air Force base: Parcel I: A parcel of land situated in the Southwest one-quarter of Section 9, Township 4 South, Range 66 West of the 6th Principal Meridian, City of Aurora, County of Arapahoe, State of Colorado, being more particularly described as follows:
(3) (a) (I) The state of Colorado hereby cedes concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of the state to the United States over the following tract of land situated in the Buckley Air Force base: Parcel I: A parcel of land situated in the Southwest one-quarter of Section 9, Township 4 South, Range 66 West of the 6th Principal Meridian, City of Aurora, County of Arapahoe, State of Colorado, being more particularly described as follows:

Parcel I is also described as: Township Four South (T42), Range Sixty-Six West (R66W) of the Sixth Principal Meridian Section Nine (9): A tract of land situated in the SW1/4 being more particularly described as follows:

Commencing at the Southwest corner of said Section 9 also being a point on the centerline of South Airport Blvd.:

Thence North 00

ø

01′13″ East, along the West line of said Section 9, a distance of 961.37 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING;

Thence continuing North 00

ø

01′13″ East, along said west line of said section 9, a distance of 696.00 feet;

Thence North 89

ø

56′13″ East, a distance of 1641.34 feet;

Thence South 00

ø

05′27″ East, a distance of 1669.72 feet to the south line of said SE1/4 of Section 9;

Thence North 44

ø

56′19″ West, a distance of 631.32 feet;

Thence North 74

ø

06′17″ West, a distance of 432.00 feet;

Thence North 43

ø

06′17″ West, a distance of 558.00 feet;

Thence South 89

ø

53′43″, a distance of 400.00 feet, to the POINT OF BEGINNING.

Commencing at the Southwest corner of said Section 9, whence the West One-Quarter corner of said Section 9 bears North 00

ø

26′25″ West, a distance of 2642.40 feet, said line forming the Basis of Bearings for this description; Thence North 00

ø

26′25″ West along the west line of said Southwest One-Quarter of Section 9 a distance of 960.90 feet to the Point of Beginning;

Thence continuing North 00

ø

26′25″ West along said west line of the Southwest One-Quarter a distance of 696.00 feet;

Thence North 89

ø

36′05″ East a distance of 1641.34 feet;

Thence South 00

ø

25′35″ East a distance of 1669.69 feet to a point on the south line of said Southwest One-Quarter of section 9;

Thence North 45

ø

16′27″ West a distance of 631.35 feet;

Thence North 74

ø

26′25″ West a distance of 431.97 feet;

Thence North 43

ø

26′25″ West a distance of 558.00 feet;

Thence South 89

ø

33′35″ West a distance of 400.00 feet to the Point of Beginning.

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction ceded in this subsection (3) is vested upon acceptance by the United States through its appropriate officials and shall continue for as long as the United States owns the property.

The state of Colorado retains concurrent jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over all property specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

The state of Colorado hereby accepts the relinquishment of exclusive federal legislative jurisdiction from the United States over the following tract of land situated in the Buckley Air Force base: Parcel II: A parcel of land situated in the South one-half of Section 9, Township 4 South, Range 66 West of the 6th Principal Meridian, City of Aurora, County of Arapahoe, State of Colorado, being more particularly described as follows:

Commencing at the Southwest corner of said Section 9, whence the West One Quarter corner of said Section 9 bears North 00

ø

26′25″ West a distance of 2642.40 feet, said line forming the Basis of Bearings for this description;

Thence South 89

ø

57′07″ East along the south line of the Southwest One-Quarter of said Section 9 a distance of 55.00 feet;

Thence North 00

ø

26′25″ West along the easterly Right-OF-Way line of South Airport Boulevard and along a line 55.00 feet easterly of and parallel with the west line of said Southwest One-Quarter of Section 9 a distance of 1657.33 feet; thence North 89

ø

36′05″ East along the northerly boundary line of a parcel of land described in Reception number B3051785 of the Arapahoe County records a distance of 1586.34 feet to the northeast corner of said parcel of land and the Point of Beginning;

Thence North 89

ø

36′05″ East a distance of 443.58 feet;

Thence South 00

ø

26′58″ East a distance of 458.60 feet to a point of curvature;

Thence along the arc of a curve to the left, concave northeasterly, having a central angle of 90

ø

44′52″ and a radius of 285.16 feet a distance of 451.65 feet (chord of said curve bears South 45

ø

49′24″ East a distance of 405.90 feet);

Thence North 88

ø

48′10″ East a distance of 291.11 feet;

Thence South 00

ø

41′49″ East along a line 10.91 feet easterly of and parallel with the east line of said Southwest One-Quarter of Section 9 a distance of 938.29 feet;

Thence South 89

ø

59′48″ West along the south line of the Southeast One-Quarter of said Section 9 a distance of 10.91 feet to the South One-Quarter corner of said Section 9;

Thence North 89

ø

57′07″ West along said south line of the Southwest One-Quarter of Section 9 a distance of 1017.39 feet to the southeast corner of said parcel of land described at Reception No. B3051785 of the Arapahoe County Records;

Thence North 00

ø

25′35″ West along the easterly boundary line of said parcel of land described in Reception No. B3051785 a distance of 1669.69 feet to said northeast corner of said parcel of land and to the Point of Beginning.

The state of Colorado shall have concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the United States of the property indicated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) for as long as the United States owns the property.

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction created by this subsection (4) over the property indicated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall take effect upon acceptance by the governor of a notice filed by the secretary of the Air Force pursuant to 10 U.S.C. sec. 2683, as amended, relinquishing exclusive federal legislative jurisdiction and retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the property. Upon receipt of the notice, the governor shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing of the date of acceptance of the notice.

The state of Colorado shall not incur or assume any liability as a result of accepting concurrent legislative jurisdiction pursuant to this subsection (4).

Upon request by the United States through its appropriate officials, the governor is authorized to execute the appropriate documents to accomplish the retrocession granted in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1685, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2006:

(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 66, § 1, effective March 27.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2000 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 346, Session Laws of Colorado 2000.

3-1-137. Severability.

If any provision of this article is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this article that can be given effect without such invalid provision.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1317), ch. 381, p. 2073, § 2, effective June 2.